Utah statutes.
7-7-3.2.   General limitation on liability.

A director or officer is not liable to the association, its stockholders, members, or depositors, any conservator or receiver, or any assignee or successor-in-interest thereof, for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director or officer, as the case may be, unless:

(1)  he has breached or failed to perform the duties of the office in compliance with this title; and

(2)  the breach or failure to perform constitutes gross negligence, willful misconduct, or intentional infliction of harm on the association, its stockholders, members, or depositors.

